Missouri, session 2026, HB3402.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 52.240, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 52.240, to read as follows:
52.240. 1. The statement and receipt required by section 52.230 shall be mailed to
the address of the taxpayer as shown by the county assessor on the current tax books, and
postage for the mailing of the statements and receipts shall be furnished by the county
commission or the statement and receipt may be electronically transmitted to the electronic
address provided and authorized by the taxpayer to the collector of revenue. The failure of
the taxpayer to receive the notice provided for in section 52.230 in no case relieves the
taxpayer of any tax liability imposed by law.
2. No penalty or interest imposed under any law shall be charged on any real or
personal property tax when the county collector certifies due to system failures or other
reason that the statement required by section 52.230 was mailed less than thirty days prior to
the delinquent date and the taxpayer paid taxes owed by fifteen days after the delinquent date
or fifteen days after the certified date of mailing, whichever is later.
3. No penalty or interest imposed under any law shall be charged on any real or
personal property tax when there is clear and convincing evidence that the county made an
error or omission in determining taxes owed by a taxpayer.
4. Any taxpayer claiming that the county made an error or omission in determining
taxes owed may submit a written request for a refund of penalties, interest, or taxes to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3402 2
county commission or governing body of the county. If the county commission or governing
body of the county approves the refund, then such penalties, interest, or taxes shall be
refunded as provided in section 139.031. The county commission shall approve or
disapprove the taxpayer's written request within thirty days of receiving said request. The
county collector shall refund penalties, interest, and taxes if the county made an error or
omission in determining taxes owed by the taxpayer.
5. Nothing in this section shall relieve a taxpayer from paying taxes owed by
December thirty-first and paying penalties and interest owed for failing to pay all taxes by
December thirty-first, except as provided with regard to penalties and interest by subsection 2
of this section.
6. The collector may waive fees and penalties if he or she determines that the
taxpayer made a good faith effort to pay the tax on time prior to the delinquent date,
provided that the taxes are paid in full within fifteen days of the delinquent date.
✔